Hawaii, session 2026, HB2062.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that gun violence is on the rise and is among the leading causes of premature and preventable death in the United States. The legislature finds that while Hawaii has some of the strongest gun safety laws and lowest rates of gun deaths in the nation, the State is not immune to rising incidents of gun violence, including gun homicides and gun suicides. The legislature further finds that Act 150, Session Laws of Hawaii 2019 (Act 150), establishes a preventative gun violence protective order law that authorizes a law enforcement officer, family or household member, medical professional, educator, or colleague to petition a court to temporarily prevent or remove an individual's access to firearms if the individual poses a danger to themselves or others.  Act 150 requires county police departments to take temporary custody of any and all firearms and ammunition for safekeeping from an individual that is the subject of a gun violence protective order. The legislature additionally finds that the use and effectiveness of Act 150 will be greatly improved through sufficient funding for community-based gun violence intervention initiatives to allow state and county law enforcement agencies and stakeholders to conduct public awareness campaigns and improve public access to information through educational and informational opportunities for Hawaii residents on the use of gun violence protective orders. The legislature also finds that state and county law enforcement agencies are uniquely positioned to provide community outreach and community-based gun violence intervention initiatives. Training on gun violence protective orders is necessary to assist county police departments in taking preventative action by assessing whether a gun violence protective order or a referral to mental health resources is appropriate for a person exhibiting warning signs or threatening behavior who is at risk of committing gun violence. The legislature recognizes that the judiciary, which reviews and processes petitions and schedules court hearings for gun violence protective orders, will foreseeably see an increase in caseload and require increased funding to meet staffing needs in fulfilling the requirements of Act 150. The legislature further finds that sensible gun violence prevention requires collaboration among all levels of government, including counties, to educate and promote public safety.  Public awareness campaigns and community outreach are essential in educating Hawaii residents about state and federal laws and existing resources relating to gun violence prevention, including safe and responsible gun ownership, filing and obtaining orders of protection, and accessing mental health and substance abuse resources. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to appropriate funds to: (1)  The judiciary to effectuate efficient processing of temporary restraining orders and gun violence protective orders, including the creation of a new court officer unit, reviewing and processing of petitions, and facilitating court hearings; and (2)  The department of law enforcement to conduct public awareness campaigns to educate Hawaii residents on gun violence, safety, intervention, and prevention through gun violence protective order laws and recognizing the rights of individuals to take action to protect themselves and others from situations that may escalate or result in gun violence. SECTION 2.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for staffing and administrative costs, including the hiring of personnel in each circuit, to effectuate efficient processing of temporary restraining orders and gun violence protective orders in accordance with part IV of chapter 134, Hawaii Revised Statutes. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the judiciary for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 3.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 to conduct community-based gun violence intervention initiatives, including public awareness campaigns on gun violence protective orders. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the department of law enforcement for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2055.